Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2823.01
Generic name, defined.

Generic name means the official title of a drug or drug combination as determined by the United States Adopted Names Council and accepted by the federal Food and Drug Administration of those drug products having the same active chemical ingredients in the same strength and quantity.

Laws 2017, LB481, § 10.